Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.41, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Earned compliance credit. "Earned compliance credit" means a one-month reduction from the period deleted text begin duringdeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end active supervision deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin duringnew text end the supervised release term for every two months that a supervised individual exhibits compliance with the conditions and goals of the individual's supervision plannew text begin , and otherwise meets the criteria established by the commissioner of corrections in policynew text end . new text begin If an individual earns sufficient earned compliance credits, the commissioner must weigh risk to public safety, including the individual's stability, behavior, or overall adjustment while on supervision before placement on supervision abatement status. new text end Earned compliance credit also applies to a conditional release term. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.44, is amended to read: 244.44 APPLYING EARNED INCENTIVE RELEASE CREDIT. Earned incentive release credits are included in calculating the term of imprisonment but are not added to the person's supervised release term, the total length of which remains unchanged. The maximum amount of earned incentive release credit that can be earned and subtracted from the term of imprisonment is 17 percent of the total executed sentence. Earned credit cannot reduce the term of imprisonment to less than one-half of the incarcerated person's executed sentence. deleted text begin Once earned,deleted text end Earned incentive release credits are deleted text begin nonrevocabledeleted text end new text begin revocable if the person violates rules of the facility where the person is incarcerated or otherwise commits a criminal act while incarceratednew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.46, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Adopting policy for earned compliance credit; supervision abatement status. (a) The commissioner must adopt a policy providing for earned compliance creditnew text begin and supervision abatement status, including the circumstances under which an individual may receive earned compliance credits and transition to supervision abatement statusnew text end . (b) Except as otherwise provided in the act, once the time served on active supervision plus earned compliance credits equals the total length of the supervised release termnew text begin ornew text end , new text begin if applicable, the aggregate length of the supervised release term and conditional release term, the individual is eligible for supervision abatement status. However, new text end the commissioner mustnew text begin notnew text end place the individual on supervision abatement status for the remainder of the supervised new text begin or conditional new text end release term deleted text begin and, if applicable, the conditional release termdeleted text end new text begin if the commissioner determines that doing so would present a risk to public safety, after weighing factors including the individual's stability, behavior, or overall adjustment while on supervisionnew text end .new text begin For individuals with lifetime terms of conditional release, the commissioner shall not place the individual on supervision abatement status unless the time served on active supervision plus earned compliance credits equals at least ten years.new text end